Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2. Control Board Generally.
For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

For article, “Why Does the Chesapeake Bay Need Litigators?,” see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1113 (2006).

For annual survey article, see “Environmental Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 423 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 20; 9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 5.